Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-137
Air navigation facility; certificate of approval; revocation, grounds.

The division is empowered to temporarily or permanently revoke any certificate of approval or license issued by it when it shall determine that an airport, restricted landing area, or other navigation facility is not being maintained or used in accordance with the State Aeronautics Act and the rules and regulations lawfully adopted and promulgated pursuant thereto.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 9(10), p. 95;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 31.